Illinois, session 104th, HB3143.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-8A-4 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-8A-4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8A-4)7    Sec. 5-8A-4. Program description. The supervising 8authority may promulgate rules that prescribe reasonable 9guidelines under which an electronic monitoring and home 10detention program shall operate. When using electronic 11monitoring for home detention these rules may include, but not 12be limited to, the following:13        (A) The participant may be instructed to remain within 14    the interior premises or within the property boundaries of 15    his or her residence at all times during the hours 16    designated by the supervising authority. Such instances of 17    approved absences from the home shall include, but are not 18    limited to, the following:19            (1) working or employment approved by the court or 20        traveling to or from approved employment;21            (2) unemployed and seeking employment approved for 22        the participant by the court;23            (3) undergoing medical, psychiatric, mental health   HB3143- 2 -LRB104 05036 RLC 15064 b1        treatment, counseling, or other treatment programs 2        approved for the participant by the court;3            (4) attending an educational institution or a 4        program approved for the participant by the court;5            (5) attending a regularly scheduled religious 6        service at a place of worship;7            (6) participating in community work release or 8        community service programs approved for the 9        participant by the supervising authority;10            (7) for another compelling reason consistent with 11        the public interest, as approved by the supervising 12        authority; or13            (8) purchasing groceries, food, or other basic 14        necessities. 15        (A-1) (Blank). At a minimum, any person ordered to 16    pretrial home confinement with or without electronic 17    monitoring must be provided with movement spread out over 18    no fewer than two days per week, to participate in basic 19    activities such as those listed in paragraph (A). In this 20    subdivision (A-1), "days" means a reasonable time period 21    during a calendar day, as outlined by the court in the 22    order placing the person on home confinement. 23        (B) The participant shall admit any person or agent 24    designated by the supervising authority into his or her 25    residence at any time for purposes of verifying the 26    participant's compliance with the conditions of his or her   HB3143- 3 -LRB104 05036 RLC 15064 b1    detention.2        (C) The participant shall make the necessary 3    arrangements to allow for any person or agent designated 4    by the supervising authority to visit the participant's 5    place of education or employment at any time, based upon 6    the approval of the educational institution employer or 7    both, for the purpose of verifying the participant's 8    compliance with the conditions of his or her detention.9        (D) The participant shall acknowledge and participate 10    with the approved electronic monitoring device as 11    designated by the supervising authority at any time for 12    the purpose of verifying the participant's compliance with 13    the conditions of his or her detention.14        (E) The participant shall maintain the following:15            (1) access to a working telephone;16            (2) a monitoring device in the participant's home, 17        or on the participant's person, or both; and18            (3) a monitoring device in the participant's home 19        and on the participant's person in the absence of a 20        telephone.21        (F) The participant shall obtain approval from the 22    supervising authority before the participant changes 23    residence or the schedule described in subsection (A) of 24    this Section. Such approval shall not be unreasonably 25    withheld. 26        (G) The participant shall not commit another crime   HB3143- 4 -LRB104 05036 RLC 15064 b1    during the period of home detention ordered by the Court.2        (H) Notice to the participant that violation of the 3    order for home detention may subject the participant to 4    prosecution for the crime of escape as described in 5    Section 5-8A-4.1.6        (I) The participant shall abide by other conditions as 7    set by the supervising authority.8    The supervising authority shall adopt rules to immediately 9remove all approved electronic monitoring devices of a 10pregnant participant during labor and delivery. 11    This Section takes effect January 1, 2022. 12(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 13102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 103-745, eff. 1-1-25.)